devtools/test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! +CmpN/First     - ok - first part only, or alone
! +CmpN/Pref      - ok - prefix only, never alone
! +CmpN/Last      - ok - last part only, or alone
! +CmpN/Suff      - ok - suffix only, never alone
! +CmpN/None      - ok - Can not take part in compounds
! +CmpN/Only      - ok - Can only be part of a compound (all positions), but not alone

 @U.CmpFrst.TRUE@
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@
 @D.CmpLast.TRUE@
 @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
 @U.CmpLast.TRUE@
 @D.CmpNone.TRUE@
 @U.CmpNone.FALSE@
 @U.CmpNone.TRUE@
 @D.CmpHyph.TRUE@
 @U.CmpHyph.FALSE@
 @U.CmpHyph.TRUE@
 @C.CmpHyph@
 @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@
 @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@
 @P.CmpOnly.FALSE@
 @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@
 @U.CmpPref.TRUE@
 @D.CmpPref.TRUE@
 @P.CmpPref.FALSE@

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
  @U.CmpFrst.TRUE@be   Infl ; ! First or alone
                  gå   Infl ; ! Everywhere & alone
  @P.CmpLast.TRUE@else Infl ; ! Last or alone
  @U.CmpNone.TRUE@prat Infl ; ! Never part of a compound
  @U.CmpHyph.TRUE@prut Infl ; ! Only part of compounds with hyphens
 @P.CmpOnly.FALSE@hend Infl ; ! CmpOnly - Never alone -> this to R
  @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@hend Infl ; ! CmpOnly - Never alone -> this to EndLex
  @U.CmpPref.TRUE@an   Infl ; ! First only, never alone
 @P.CmpOnly.FALSE@@P.CmpLast.TRUE@olse Infl ; ! Last only, never alone -> this to R
  @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@@P.CmpLast.TRUE@olse Infl ; ! Last only, never alone -> this to EndLex

LEXICON Infl
  ing EndLex ;
  ing R      ;
  ing Rhyph  ;
      EndLex ;
      R      ;
      Rhyph  ;

LEXICON EndLex
  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@ # ;

LEXICON R
  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpHyph.TRUE@@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@ Nouns ;

LEXICON Rhyph
  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@C.CmpHyph@ Hyph ;

LEXICON Hyph 
    %- Nouns;

! Root -> Noun -> P.midlstart.TRUE P.midlend.TRUE Mord -> slutt
! Root -> Noun -> P.midlstart.TRUE P.midlend.TRUE Mord -> R -> D.midlstart.TRUE C.midlend
! Root -> Noun ->                                 Xord -> R -> D.midlstart.TRUE C.midlend -> Noun -> P.midlstart.TRUE P.midlend.TRUE Mord -> slutt -> D.midlend.TRUE
! Root -> Noun ->                                 Xord -> R -> D.midlstart.TRUE C.midlend -> Noun -> P.midlstart.TRUE P.midlend.TRUE Mord -> R -> D.midlstart.TRUE C.midlend
